Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0548.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
CHAPTER 4A
MARKET CONDUCT EXAMINATIONS
Sec. 481. As used in this chapter:
(a) "Complaint" means a written or oral communication that is
documented that primarily expresses a grievance. As used in this
subdivision, "grievance" means an expression of dissatisfaction.
(b) "Desk examination" means a targeted examination that is
conducted by an examiner at a location other than the insurer's
premises. A desk examination is usually performed at the
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


department's offices with the insurer providing, for review,
requested documents by hard copy, microfiche, discs, or other
electronic media.
(c) "Insurer" means that term as defined in section 106 and
includes a nonprofit dental care corporation operating under 1963
PA 125, MCL 550.351 to 550.373.
(d) "Market analysis" means a process through which market
conduct surveillance personnel collect and analyze pertinent
information from filed schedules, surveys, required reports, and
other sources in order to develop a baseline understanding of the
marketplace and to identify, for further review, patterns or
practices of insurers that deviate significantly from the norm or
that may pose a potential risk to insurance consumers. The director
shall ensure that the NAIC Market Regulation Handbook is used as 1
resource in performing a market analysis. For purposes of this
subdivision, "pertinent information" means information gathered by
market conduct surveillance personnel from all of the following:
(i) Data currently available to the department.
(ii) Surveys and information from required reports.
(iii) Information collected by the NAIC and other sources in the
public and private sectors.
(iv) Information from within and outside the insurance
industry.
(e) "Market conduct action" means any activities that the
director may initiate to assess and address the market practices of
insurers, including, but not limited to, a market analysis and,
following a market analysis, the provision of a targeted
examination. Market conduct action does not include the director's
resolution of an individual consumer complaint or other report of a
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


specific instance of misconduct.
(f) "Market conduct surveillance personnel" means those
individuals employed or contracted by the director to collect,
analyze, review, or act on information concerning the insurance
marketplace that identifies patterns or practices of insurers.
(g) "NAIC" means the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners.
(h) "NAIC Market Conduct Examiner's Handbook" means the set of
guidelines developed and adopted by the NAIC that documents
established practices to be used by market conduct surveillance
personnel in developing and executing an examination, or a
successor document.
(i) "NAIC Market Conduct Uniform Examination Procedures" means
the set of guidelines developed and adopted by the NAIC designed to
be used by market conduct surveillance personnel in conducting an
examination, or a successor document.
(j) "NAIC Market Regulation Handbook" means the outline of the
elements and objectives of market analysis developed and adopted by
the NAIC and the process by which states can establish and
implement market analysis programs, or a successor document.
(k) "NAIC Standard Data Request" means the set of field names
and descriptions developed and adopted by the NAIC for use by
market conduct surveillance personnel in an examination.
(l) "On-site examination" means a targeted examination
conducted at the insurer's home office or the location where the
records under review are stored.
(m) "Qualified contract examiner" means a person under
contract with the director who is qualified by education,
experience, and, where applicable, professional designations to
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


perform market conduct actions.
(n) "Targeted examination" means a focused exam based on the
results of a market analysis that indicates a need to review a
specific line of business or specific business practices. A
targeted examination may be conducted by desk examination or by an
on-site examination. As referenced in this subdivision, "specific
line of business or specific business practices" includes, but is
not limited to, the following:
(i) Underwriting and rating.
(ii) Marketing and sales.
(iii) Complaint handling operations and management.
(iv) Advertising materials.
(v) Licensing.
(vi) Policyholder services.
(vii) Nonforfeitures.
(viii) Claims handling.
(ix) Policy forms and filings.
(o) "Third-party model or product" means a model or product
provided by an entity separate from, and not under direct or
indirect corporate control of, the insurer using the model or
product.
Sec. 482. (1) The director shall, on an ongoing basis, ensure
that market analysis is conducted.
(2) Subject to subsection (4), if the director determines, as
a result of a market analysis, that further inquiry into a
particular insurer or practice is needed, the director may consider
the following continuum of market conduct actions before conducting
a targeted examination by on-site examination:
(a) Correspondence with the insurer.
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


(b) Insurer interviews.
(c) Information gathering.
(d) Policy and procedure reviews.
(e) Interrogatories.
(f) Review of insurer self-evaluation and compliance programs.
If the director is satisfied that the organization's qualification
process is likely to provide reasonable assurance of compliance
with pertinent insurance laws, the review under this subdivision
may include consideration of the insurer's membership in a best-
practices organization.
(g) Desk examinations.
(h) Examinations.
(3) If the director considers a continuum of market conduct
actions under subsection (2) and the consideration involves insurer
participation or response, the director shall make the action in
consideration known to the insurer in writing.
(4) If the director considers a continuum of market conduct
actions under subsection (2), the director shall select actions for
consideration that yield a consideration that is cost effective for
the department and the insurer and that protect insurance
consumers.
(5) The director shall take steps reasonably necessary to
eliminate duplicative inquiries and shall coordinate market conduct
actions and findings with other states.
Sec. 483. (1) Market conduct actions taken as a result of a
market analysis must focus on the general business practices and
compliance activities of insurers rather than identifying
infrequent or unintentional random errors that do not cause
significant consumer harm.
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
director may determine the frequency and timing of market conduct
actions. However, unless extraordinary circumstances indicate a
risk to consumers if immediate action is not taken, the director
shall take into account the specific market conduct action in
determining timing as described in this subsection.
(3) If the director has information indicating that more than
1 insurer is engaged in common practices that may violate statute
or rules, the director may schedule and coordinate multiple market
conduct actions simultaneously.
(4) The director may give an insurer reasonable opportunity to
resolve, to the satisfaction of the director, matters that arise as
a result of a market analysis before additional market conduct
actions are taken against the insurer.
(5) The director shall give notice and provide parties with an
opportunity for a public hearing under the administrative
procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, for any
changes made to an NAIC work product referenced in this chapter
that changes the way in which market conduct actions are conducted
in either of the following circumstances:
(a) A change is made that necessitates a change in statute,
regulation, or rule.
(b) The director deviates from the most recently adopted NAIC
work product.
(6) Except as otherwise provided by law, every person from
whom information is sought for purposes of this chapter and the
person's officers, directors, and agents shall provide the director
convenient and free access to all books, records, accounts, papers,
documents, and any computer or other recordings relating to the
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


property, assets, business, and affairs of the person. An officer,
director, employee, insurance producer, and agent of a person shall
facilitate market conduct actions and aid in market conduct actions
so far as it is in their power to do so.
Sec. 484. (1) If the director determines that the continuum of
market conduct actions identified in section 482(2) is not
appropriate, the director may conduct a targeted examination by on-
site examination in accordance with NAIC Market Conduct Uniform
Examination Procedures and the NAIC Market Conduct Examiner's
Handbook.
(2) In conjunction with the notification requirements under
subsection (8), the director shall post notification on the NAIC
Examination Tracking System, or a successor NAIC product, as
determined by the director, that a market conduct action has been
scheduled.
(3) Instead of market conduct action against an insurer
licensed in this state, the director may accept an examination
report from another state provided that the state has a market
surveillance system the director deems comparable to the market
surveillance system set forth under this chapter. The director's
determination under this subsection is discretionary and is not
subject to appeal.
(4) Before a targeted examination by on-site examination,
market conduct surveillance personnel must prepare a work plan
consisting of all of the following:
(a) The name and address of the insurer being examined.
(b) The name and contact information of the examiner-in-
charge.
(c) The justification for the targeted examination by on-site
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


examination.
(d) The scope of the targeted examination by on-site
examination.
(e) The date the on-site examination is scheduled to begin.
(f) Notice of any non-insurance department personnel who will
assist in the examination.
(g) A time estimate for the targeted examination by on-site
examination.
(h) A budget for the targeted examination by on-site
examination, if the cost of the examination is billed to the
insurer.
(i) An identification of factors that will be included in the
billing if the cost of the examination is billed to the insurer.
(5) Market conduct action must, to the extent feasible, be
conducted by desk examination, and data requests must be utilized
before a targeted examination by on-site examination is utilized.
(6) Market conduct action must be conducted in accordance with
the provisions set forth in the NAIC Market Conduct Examiner's
Handbook and the NAIC Market Conduct Uniform Examinations
Procedures.
(7) The department shall use the NAIC Standard Data Request or
a successor product to request data or information during an on-
site examination.
(8) The director shall make an announcement of market conduct
action by sending it to the insurer and posting on the NAIC's
Examination Tracking System, or a successor product, as determined
by the director, as soon as possible, but, except when the action
is conducted in response to an extraordinary circumstance described
in section 483(2), if a targeted examination is by on-site
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


examination, by not later than 60 days before the estimated
commencement of the targeted examination by on-site examination.
The announcement described in this subsection must contain both of
the following, as applicable:
(a) An examination work plan.
(b) A request for the insurer to name its examination
coordinator.
(9) Not later than 30 days before the commencement of market
conduct action, the director shall conduct a pre-examination
conference with the insurer examination coordinator and key
personnel to clarify expectations.
(10) Before the conclusion of a targeted examination by on-
site examination, a person among the market conduct surveillance
personnel who is designated as the examiner-in-charge shall
schedule an exit conference with the insurer.
(11) Unless a mutual agreement is reached with the insurer to
modify the timeline, the director shall adhere to the following
timeline:
(a) The director must deliver a draft report to the insurer
not later than 60 days after the completion of market conduct
action. Completion of the market conduct action is the date the
director is considered to confirm, in writing, that the market
conduct action is completed.
(b) The insurer must respond with written comments not later
than 30 days after receipt of the draft report described in
subdivision (a).
(c) Unless a mutual agreement is reached between the director
and the insurer to extend the deadline, the department shall make a
good-faith effort to resolve issues informally and prepare a final
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


report not later than 30 days after receipt of the insurer's
written comments as described in subdivision (b). The director may
make corrections and other changes to the final report as
appropriate.
(d) The insurer must, not later than 30 days after issuance of
the final report, accept the final report and accept the findings
of the report or request a hearing. If agreed on by the director
and the insurer, not more than 30 days may be added to the 30-day
deadline described in this subsection. A hearing request described
in this subdivision must comply with the requirements of the
administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to
24.328.
(12) The director shall include the insurer's response
described under subsection (11) in the final report described under
subsection (11). The insurer's response may be included as an
appendix or in the text of the examination report. This chapter
does not require an insurer to submit a response. Individuals
involved in the examination must not be named in either the report
or the response, except to acknowledge their involvement.
(13) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (14), on
acceptance of the final report under subsection (11), the director
shall continue to hold the content of the report as private and
confidential for a period of not less than 30 days. After the 30-
day period described in this subsection, unless a court of
competent jurisdiction has stayed its publication, the director
shall open the report for public inspection.
(14) This chapter does not prevent the director from
disclosing the content of any of the following to a department of
this state, a department of any other state, or a federal agency,
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


at any time, that agrees to hold the content as confidential in a
manner that is consistent with this chapter:
(a) A final report described under subsection (11).
(b) A preliminary examination report or results.
(c) Any matter relating to the items described in subdivisions
(a) and (b).
(15) If reasonable and necessary costs of a market conduct
action are assessed against an insurer that is subject to the
action, the fees must be consistent with fees otherwise authorized
under law. The fees described in this subsection must be itemized,
and bills must be provided to the insurer on a monthly basis for
review before submission for payment.
(16) The director shall maintain active management and
oversight of examination costs for examinations described in this
chapter, including costs associated with the director's own
examiners and with retaining qualified contract examiners necessary
to perform an on-site examination. To the extent the director
retains outside assistance in administering the requirements under
this chapter, the director shall have, in writing, protocols that
do all of the following:
(a) Clearly identify the types of functions to be subject to
outsourcing.
(b) Provide specific timelines for completion of the
outsourced review.
(c) Require disclosure of contract examiners' recommendations.
(d) Establish and utilize a dispute resolution or arbitration
mechanism to resolve conflicts with insurers regarding examination
fees.
(e) Require disclosure of the terms of the contracts with the
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


outside consultants that will be used, specifically the fees and
hourly rates that can be charged.
(17) The director shall review and affirmatively endorse
detailed billings from a qualified contract examiner before the
detailed billings are sent to the insurer.
Sec. 485. (1) Except as otherwise provided by law and subject
to subsection (4), during market conduct action, market conduct
surveillance personnel must have as free, convenient, and full
access, as practicable, to all books and records, employees,
officers, and directors of the insurer subject to the market
conduct action. An insurer that uses a third-party model or product
for any of the activities subject to action shall, on the request
of market conduct surveillance personnel, ensure that the details
of the models or products are made available to the market conduct
surveillance personnel. All documents, including, but not limited
to, working papers, third-party models or products, complaint logs,
and copies of those items, that are created, produced, obtained by,
or disclosed to any of the following persons as follows are
confidential and privileged, are not subject to subpoena, and are
not subject to discovery or admissible as evidence in any private
civil action:
(a) The director or any other person in the course of any
market conduct actions made under this chapter.
(b) The director in the course of a market analysis by the
director of the market conditions of an insurer.
(c) The NAIC as a result of any provision of this chapter.
(2) A disclosure to the director under this section does not
waive any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality as
created under subsection (1).
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


(3) If an action is ordered by the director under section 222,
market conduct surveillance personnel may issue subpoenas and
examine insurance company personnel under oath.
(4) In performing duties under this chapter, the director may
do all of the following:
(a) Share documents, materials, or other information,
including confidential and privileged documents, materials, or
information described in subsection (1), with other state, federal,
and international regulatory agencies, law enforcement authorities,
and the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries, if the recipient
agrees to, and has the legal authority to, maintain the
confidential and privileged status of the document, material, or
information.
(b) Receive documents, materials, or information, including
otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, or
information, from the NAIC and its affiliates or subsidiaries and
regulatory and law enforcement officials of other foreign or
domestic jurisdictions. The director shall maintain as confidential
or privileged any document, material, or information described in
this subdivision that is received with notice or the understanding
that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the
jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or
information.
(c) Enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of
information consistent with this subsection.
Sec. 486. (1) Market conduct surveillance personnel must be
qualified by education, experience, and, where applicable,
professional designations. If the director determines that the
assistance is necessary, the director may supplement in-house
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


market conduct surveillance staff with qualified outside
professional assistance.
(2) Market conduct surveillance personnel have a conflict of
interest, either directly or indirectly, if they are affiliated
with the management of, have been employed by, or own a pecuniary
interest in the insurer that is subject to any examination under
this chapter. This section does not automatically preclude any of
the following individuals from serving as market conduct
surveillance personnel:
(a) A policyholder or claimant under an insurance policy.
(b) A grantee of a mortgage or similar instrument on the
individual's residence from a regulated entity if done under
customary terms and in the ordinary course of business.
(c) An investment owner in shares of regulated diversified
investment companies.
(d) A settlor or beneficiary of a blind trust into which any
otherwise permissible holdings have been placed.
Sec. 487. (1) A person shall not file a civil action against
the director, the director's authorized representative, or an
examiner appointed by the director, and the director, the
director's authorized representatives, or an examiner appointed by
the director is not liable, for any statements made or conduct
performed in good faith while carrying out this chapter.
(2) A person shall not file a civil action against any person,
and a person is not liable, for communicating or delivering
information or data to the director, the director's authorized
representative, or an examiner pursuant to an examination made
under this chapter, if the communication or delivery was performed
in good faith and without fraudulent intent or an intent to
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


deceive.
(3) The director, the director's authorized representative, or
an examiner appointed by the director is entitled to an award of
attorney fees and costs if the director, the director's authorized
representative, or an examiner appointed by the director is the
prevailing party in a civil action for libel, slander, or any other
relevant tort arising out of activities in carrying out this
chapter, and the person bringing the action was not substantially
justified in bringing the action. As used in this subsection,
"substantially justified" means the action had a reasonable basis
in law or fact at the time that it was initiated.
(4) This section does not abrogate or modify any applicable
common law or statutory privilege or immunity.
Sec. 488. (1) Fines and penalties applied to an insurer under
this act applied as a result of market conduct action must be
consistent, reasonable, and justified.
(2) In determining the appropriate fines to apply as described
under subsection (1), the director shall consider both of the
following factors:
(a) Actions taken by insurers to maintain membership in, and
comply with the standards of, best-practices organizations that
promote high ethical standards of conduct in the marketplace.
(b) The extent to which insurers maintain regulatory
compliance programs to self-assess, self-report, and remediate
problems detected.
Sec. 489. (1) The director shall collect and report market
data to the NAIC's market information systems, including the NAIC
Complaint Database System, the NAIC Examination Tracking System,
and the NAIC Regulatory Information Retrieval System, or other
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4


successor NAIC products, as determined by the director.
(2) The department shall compile information it collects and
maintains in a manner that meets the requirements of the NAIC.
Sec. 490. The director shall share information and coordinate
the department's market analysis and examination efforts with other
states through the NAIC.
Sec. 491. (1) The director shall, at least annually, make
available, in an appropriate manner, information on new laws and
regulations, enforcement actions, and other information the
director determines is pertinent to ensure compliance with market
conduct requirements to persons subject to this chapter. The
failure of the director to provide information is not a defense for
an insurer that fails to comply with any insurance law of this
state.
(2) The director must designate a specific person or persons
within the department whose responsibilities must include the
receipt of information from employees of insurers and licensed
entities concerning violations of laws, rules, or regulations by
employers, as defined in this chapter. The director shall provide
the person or persons described in this subsection with proper
training on the handling of the information that is considered
confidential communication for the purposes of this chapter.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect January
1, 2026.
Final Page
DAW S03525'25 (S-1) p9k8w4